Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8609
Blindness-related services; qualifications; commission; duties.

(1) For a person to qualify for blindness-related services from the commission, the commission shall find such person to be (a) a blind person as defined in subdivision (1)(a) of section 71-8603 or (b) a person who is experiencing a deteriorating condition which is expected to result in blindness. A person seeking to qualify for blindness-related services may obtain an eye examination from a licensed ophthalmologist or optometrist of his or her choice or provide other certifying evidence of existing or potential visual impairment as required by the rules and regulations of the commission.

(2) The commission shall maintain a list of all ophthalmologists and optometrists currently licensed in Nebraska and establish procedures for a person to obtain evidence to verify that he or she qualifies for blindness-related services.

(3) When an eye examination is required for a person seeking to qualify for blindness-related services, the commission shall pay the cost pursuant to its rules and regulations. The commission may assist any person seeking to qualify for blindness-related services under the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired Act in arranging an eye examination or obtaining other evidence pursuant to this section.

Laws 2000, LB 352, § 9.